Florida, session 2026, HB321.
Be It Enacted by the Legislature of the State of Florida:

Section 1. Section 790.0135, Florida Statutes, is created
to read:
790.0135 Carrying a weapon or firearm; prohibited
locations.—
(1) Unless otherwise authorized by law, a person may not
carry a weapon or firearm into:
(a) A place of nuisance as defined in s. 823.05;
(b) A police, sheriff, or highway patrol station;
(c) A detention facility, prison, or jail;
(d) A courthouse;
(e) A courtroom, except that this section does not
preclude a judge from carrying a weapon or firearm or
determining who will carry a weapon or firearm in his or her
courtroom;
Page 1 of 5
CODING: Words stricken are deletions; words underlined are additions.
hb321-00

F L O R I D A H O U S E O F R E P R E S E N T A T I V E S
HB 321 2026
(f) A polling place;
(g) A meeting of the governing body of a county, public
school district, municipality, or special district;
(h) A meeting of the Legislature or a committee thereof;
(i) A school, college, or professional athletic event not
related to firearms;
(j) An elementary or secondary school facility or
administration building;
(k) A career center;
(l) A portion of an establishment licensed to dispense
alcoholic beverages for consumption on the premises, which
portion of the establishment is primarily devoted to such
purpose;
(m) A college or university facility unless the person is
a registered student, employee, or faculty member of such
college or university and the weapon is a stun gun or nonlethal
electric weapon or device designed solely for defensive purposes
and the weapon does not fire a dart or projectile;
(n) The inside of the passenger terminal and sterile area
of an airport, except that a person is not prohibited from
carrying a legal firearm into the terminal which is encased for
shipment for purposes of checking such firearm as baggage to be
lawfully transported on an aircraft; or
(o) Any place where the carrying of firearms is prohibited
by federal law.
Page 2 of 5
CODING: Words stricken are deletions; words underlined are additions.
hb321-00

F L O R I D A H O U S E O F R E P R E S E N T A T I V E S
HB 321 2026
(2) This section does not:
(a) Prohibit a person from carrying or storing a firearm
in a vehicle for lawful purposes.
(b) Modify the terms or conditions of s. 790.251(7).
(3) A person who knowingly and willfully violates this
section commits a misdemeanor of the second degree, punishable
as provided in s. 775.082 or s. 775.083.
Section 2. Section 790.013, Florida Statutes, is amended
to read:
790.013 Carrying of concealed weapons or concealed
firearms without a license.—A person who carries a concealed
weapon or concealed firearm without a license as authorized
under s. 790.01(1)(b):
(1) must carry valid identification at all times when he
or she is in actual possession of a concealed weapon or
concealed firearm and must display such identification upon
demand by a law enforcement officer. A violation of this section
subsection is a noncriminal violation punishable by a $25 fine,
payable to the clerk of the court.
(2) Is subject to s. 790.06(12) in the same manner as a
person who is licensed to carry a concealed weapon or concealed
firearm.
Section 3. Subsection (12) of section 790.06, Florida
Statutes, is amended to read:
790.06 License to carry concealed weapon or concealed
Page 3 of 5
CODING: Words stricken are deletions; words underlined are additions.
hb321-00

F L O R I D A H O U S E O F R E P R E S E N T A T I V E S
HB 321 2026
firearm.—
(12)(a) A license issued under this section does not
authorize any person to openly carry a handgun or carry a
concealed weapon or concealed firearm into:
1. Any place of nuisance as defined in s. 823.05;
2. Any police, sheriff, or highway patrol station;
3. Any detention facility, prison, or jail;
4. Any courthouse;
5. Any courtroom, except that nothing in this section
precludes a judge from carrying a concealed weapon or concealed
firearm or determining who will carry a concealed weapon or
concealed firearm in his or her courtroom;
6. Any polling place;
7. Any meeting of the governing body of a county, public
school district, municipality, or special district;
8. Any meeting of the Legislature or a committee thereof;
9. Any school, college, or professional athletic event not
related to firearms;
10. Any elementary or secondary school facility or
administration building;
11. Any career center;
12. Any portion of an establishment licensed to dispense
alcoholic beverages for consumption on the premises, which
portion of the establishment is primarily devoted to such
100 purpose;
Page 4 of 5
CODING: Words stricken are deletions; words underlined are additions.
hb321-00

F L O R I D A H O U S E O F R E P R E S E N T A T I V E S
HB 321 2026
101 13. Any college or university facility unless the licensee
102 is a registered student, employee, or faculty member of such
103 college or university and the weapon is a stun gun or nonlethal
104 electric weapon or device designed solely for defensive purposes
105 and the weapon does not fire a dart or projectile;
106 14. The inside of the passenger terminal and sterile area
107 of any airport, provided that no person shall be prohibited from
108 carrying any legal firearm into the terminal, which firearm is
109 encased for shipment for purposes of checking such firearm as
110 baggage to be lawfully transported on any aircraft; or
111 15. Any place where the carrying of firearms is prohibited
112 by federal law.
113 (b) A person licensed under this section is not prohibited
114 from carrying or storing a firearm in a vehicle for lawful
115 purposes.
116 (c) This section does not modify the terms or conditions
117 of s. 790.251(7).
118 (d) Any person who knowingly and willfully violates any
119 provision of this subsection commits a misdemeanor of the second
120 degree, punishable as provided in s. 775.082 or s. 775.083.
121 Section 4. This act shall take effect upon becoming a law.
Page 5 of 5
CODING: Words stricken are deletions; words underlined are additions.
hb321-00